Nevada, session 83, SB47.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 679B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 10, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 10, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 3 to 6, inclusive, of this act have the meanings ascribed
to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Behavioral health care” means care for a mental
illness, other mental health condition, intellectual disability,
developmental disability or substance use disorder.
Sec. 4. “Developmental disability” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 435.007.
Sec. 5. “Health insurer” means any insurer, governmental
entity or other organization providing health coverage or benefits
in accordance with state or federal law.
Sec. 6. “Intellectual disability” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 435.007.
Sec. 7. 1. The Commissioner shall:
(a) Apply for gifts, grants and donations to support the study
described in paragraph (b); and
(b) To the extent money is available pursuant to paragraph (a),
enter into a contract with a qualified person or entity to study the
degree to which public and private insurance plans in this State
achieve parity between:
(1) Coverage for behavioral health care; and
(2) Coverage for other medical care.
2. The Commissioner may collaborate or enter into a contract
with any person or entity to assist in applying for gifts, grants and
donations pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1.
3. The Commissioner and the person or entity with whom the
Commissioner enters into a contract pursuant to subsection 1 may
enter into a contract or otherwise collaborate with a non-profit
organization that specializes in data analytics relating to health
-
*SB47_R1*

– 3 –
insurance as necessary to conduct the study pursuant to
subsection 1.
4. The study conducted pursuant to subsection 1 must
include, without limitation:
(a) An analysis of the degree to which health insurers in this
State comply with the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental
Health Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008, Public Law 110-
343, Division C, Title V, Subtitle B;
(b) A comparison of the terms under which health insurers in
this State cover behavioral health care to the terms under which
such health insurers cover other forms of medical care, including,
without limitation:
(1) The adequacy of networks;
(2) Rates of reimbursement;
(3) Incentives offered by insurers to providers of health
care;
(4) Rates of denial of coverage;
(5) Prior authorization; and
(6) Step therapy; and
(c) An investigation into:
(1) The adequacy of the workforce providing behavioral
health care in this State;
(2) The potential and, if applicable, actual outcomes of
having an inadequate workforce providing behavioral health care,
including, without limitation:
(I) Increased rates of substance use disorder, suicidal
ideation and suicide; and
(II) Direct and indirect monetary costs to the State
Government, local governments and other persons and entities in
this State;
(3) The emergency and inpatient care provided to treat
behavioral health conditions or related health conditions that are
preventable or better treated in an outpatient setting;
(4) Rates of unemployment or loss of personal income
related to persons suffering from behavioral health conditions;
and
(5) The cost to the State of claims for disability due to
behavioral health conditions.
5. The study conducted pursuant to subsection 1 may include
a market survey that compares any or all of the metrics described
in subsection 4 to the same metrics in other states. If conducted,
the market survey must include, without limitation:
(a) A comparison to metrics in states that have achieved
greater parity between coverage for behavioral health care and
coverage for other medical care; and
-
*SB47_R1*

– 4 –
(b) Consideration for the limited pool of health insurers in this
State.
6. As used in this section, “network” means a defined set of
providers of health care who are under contract with a health
insurer to provide health care services.
Sec. 8. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law and
except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, upon a request made
to obtain information for the purposes of the study conducted
pursuant to section 7 of this act, the following persons and entities
shall submit information to the Commissioner or the person or
entity with whom the Commissioner enters into a contract
pursuant to subsection 1 of section 7 of this act:
(a) Health insurers that offer or issue policies of health
insurance in this State, including, without limitation, the Public
Employees’ Benefits Program;
(b) Except where federal law prohibits the Commissioner from
requiring the submission of such information, a self-funded
multiple employer welfare arrangement that:
(1) Has been issued a certificate of authority by the
Commissioner; and
(2) Provides health coverage or benefits to residents of this
State;
(c) The Department of Health and Human Services and each
division and office thereof;
(d) The Division; and
(e) Any public body established by the Commissioner.
2. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of
subsection 1, a provider of health coverage for federal employees,
a provider of health coverage that is subject to the Employee
Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 or the administrator of a
Taft-Hartley trust formed pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 186(c)(5) is not
required to but may submit information to the Commissioner or
the person or entity with whom the Commissioner enters into a
contract pursuant to subsection 1 of section 7 of this act for the
purposes of the study conducted pursuant to that section.
3. The Commissioner or the person or entity with whom the
Commissioner enters into a contract pursuant to subsection 1 of
section 7 of this act may submit a request pursuant to NRS
439B.850 to obtain data from the all-payer claims database
established pursuant to NRS 439B.835, including, without
limitation, data that has not been de-identified or that includes
proprietary financial information. The Department of Health and
Human Services shall release such data upon the submission of
such a request. The Commissioner and the person or entity shall
-
*SB47_R1*

– 5 –
comply with the provisions of subsection 4 of this section and
subsection 5 of NRS 439B.855 with respect to any such data.
4. Any personally identifiable information, proprietary
financial information, trade secret or information deemed
confidential by law that is provided pursuant to this section to the
Commissioner or any person or entity with whom the
Commissioner enters into a contract is confidential. Such
information must not be included in a report compiled pursuant to
section 10 of this act or otherwise disclosed to any other person or
entity.
5. As used in this section, “multiple employer welfare
arrangement” has the meaning ascribed to it in 29 U.S.C. §
1002(40).
Sec. 9. 1. If a person or entity fails to comply with the
provisions of subsection 1 or 3 of section 8 of this act, the
Commissioner may issue a subpoena to compel the person or
entity to comply with those requirements.
2. A subpoena issued pursuant to this section shall have the
same force and effect and shall be served in the same manner as if
issued from a court of record.
3. If any person or entity fails to obey a subpoena issued
pursuant to this section, the Commissioner may file a written
report thereof and proof of service of the subpoena in any court of
competent jurisdiction, for such action as the court may
determine.
Sec. 10. 1. On or before January 31 of each year, the
Commissioner shall:
(a) Compile a report describing the progress made toward the
objectives described in subsection 1 of section 7 of this act during
the immediately preceding calendar year; and
(b) Submit the report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to:
(1) In an odd-numbered year, the next regular session of
the Legislature; and
(2) In an even-numbered year, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services.
2. Upon completion of the study conducted pursuant to
section 7 of this act, the person or entity with whom the
Commissioner enters into a contract pursuant subsection 1 of that
section shall compile and submit to the Commissioner, the
Governor and the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the Legislature a report that includes, without
limitation:
(a) The results of the study;
-
*SB47_R1*

– 6 –
(b) Recommendations to improve the reporting of data by
health insurers and the analysis of such data to ensure compliance
with the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity
and Addiction Equity Act of 2008, Public Law 110-343, Division
C, Title V, Subtitle B;
(c) Recommendations for policies to improve the degree to
which public and private insurance plans in this State achieve
parity between:
(1) Coverage for behavioral health care; and
(2) Coverage for other medical care;
(d) Recommendations for improving the development and
retention of the workforce providing behavioral health care in this
State; and
(e) Recommendations for policies to increase access to
behavioral health care in this State.
Sec. 11. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
-
*SB47_R1*

– 7 –
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
-
*SB47_R1*

– 8 –
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, section 8 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter 478,
Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes of
Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
-
*SB47_R1*

– 9 –
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 12. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 13. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval
and expires by limitation on the date on which the person or entity
with whom the Commissioner of Insurance enters into a contract
pursuant to subsection 1 of section 7 of this act submits the report
described in subsection 2 of section 10 of this act to the
Commissioner of Insurance, the Governor and the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau.
H
-
*SB47_R1*